Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.865

Electricity, telephone, or natural gas business—Limitations on tax rate changes.

No city or town may change the rate of tax it imposes on the privilege of conducting an electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business which change applies to business activities occurring before the effective date of the change, and no rate change may take effect before the expiration of sixty days following the enactment of the ordinance establishing the change except as provided in RCW 35.21.870.

[ 1983 c 99 s 4; 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Effective date—Fire district funding—1982 1st ex.s. c 49: See notes following RCW 35.21.710.